West Virginia, session 2026, HB5004.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 16. Public Health. Article 1. State Public Health SYStem. §16-1-8a. Inclusion of PANS and PANDAS in existing public health programs. (a) The Commissioner of the Bureau for Public Health, in consultation with the State Health Officer, shall, in its existing public health programs and services, to educate health care professionals on evaluating and treating Pediatric Acute-Onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome (PANS) and Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric Disorders Associated with Streptococcal Infections (PANDAS). (b) The Bureau for Public Health shall, in its existing, relevant public health outreach programs, incorporate information to increase understanding and awareness of PANS and PANDAS, including signs to be aware of, such as:(1) Presence of obsessive compulsive disorder and/or tics;(2) Symptoms begin between age three and puberty;(3) Acute-onset and episodic (relapsing-remitting) course;(4) Association with Group A Streptococcal (GAS) infection; and(5) Association with Neurological Abnormalities disease. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home